Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,103
False branding; penalty.

Any person who knowingly possesses, sells, ships, transports, or in any way disposes of any alcoholic liquor under any other than the proper name or brand known to the trade as designating the kind and quality of the contents of the package or other containers of such alcoholic liquor or who causes any such act to be done shall forfeit to the state such alcoholic liquor and such packages and containers and shall be subject to the punishment and penalties provided for violation of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 66, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-366;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,103;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 13.